Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-1578
Local housing agency; resolution or ordinance; effect.

In order for a city or county to establish a local housing agency which may conduct business and exercise its powers, the governing body of such city or county desiring to establish such agency shall adopt a resolution or ordinance declaring that there is a need for a local housing agency in such city or county because there exists a shortage of decent, safe, and sanitary housing in such city or county that is affordable to all residents thereof, regardless of income. No further action or findings shall be necessary. Upon the adoption of such resolution or ordinance, the local housing agency shall be established and shall have perpetual existence unless dissolved in accordance with law.

Laws 1999, LB 105, § 7.